Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-113 Notice. (a) Except as
otherwise ordered or waived by the court for good cause, if notice of a hearing
on a petition is required, other than a notice for which specific requirements
are otherwise provided, the petitioner shall give notice of the time and place
of the hearing to the person to be notified. Notice shall be given in
compliance with section 560:1-401, at least fourteen days before the hearing.

(b) Proof of notice shall be made before or at
the hearing and filed in the proceeding. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next